District of Columbia statutes.
10-505.07

Transfer of member of Metropolitan Police to Capitol Police — Effective date.

This part shall take effect on the 1st day of the 2nd month after the month in which this part is enacted.

History

Dec. 20, 1979, 93 Stat. 1099, Pub. L. 96-152, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-122.